src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-fem-i_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # kaali i-stem
    kaali+N+Fem+Sg+Nom: kaali
    kaali+N+Fem+Sg+Obl: kalja
    kaali+N+Fem+Sg+Dat: kaljake
    kaali+N+Fem+Sg+Abl: kaljata
    kaali+N+Fem+Sg+Ins: kaljaha
    kaali+N+Fem+Sg+Gen: kaljako
    kaali+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Kiiro: [kaljakiiro, kaalijakkiiro]
    kaali+N+Fem+Pl+Nom: kalja
    kaali+N+Fem+Pl+Obl: kaljen
    kaali+N+Fem+Pl+Dat: kaljenge
    kaali+N+Fem+Pl+Abl: kaljenna
    kaali+N+Fem+Pl+Ins: kaljensa
    kaali+N+Fem+Pl+Gen: kaljengo
    kaali+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Kiiro: kaljengiiro



Tests:
  Noun - : # kaali i-stem
    kaali+N+Fem+Sg+Nom: kaali
    kaali+N+Fem+Sg+Obl: kalja
    kaali+N+Fem+Sg+Dat: kaljake
    kaali+N+Fem+Sg+Abl: kaljata
    kaali+N+Fem+Sg+Ins: kaljaha
    kaali+N+Fem+Sg+Gen: kaljako
    kaali+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Kiiro: [kaljakiiro, kaalijakkiiro]
    kaali+N+Fem+Pl+Nom: kalja
    kaali+N+Fem+Pl+Obl: kaljen
    kaali+N+Fem+Pl+Dat: kaljenge
    kaali+N+Fem+Pl+Abl: kaljenna
    kaali+N+Fem+Pl+Ins: kaljensa
    kaali+N+Fem+Pl+Gen: kaljengo
    kaali+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Kiiro: kaljengiiro
